Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4932.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 17731. (1) Notwithstanding the requirements of part 161, the board may require either of the following: (a) That a licensee seeking renewal of a pharmacist's license furnish the department with satisfactory evidence that, during the 2 years immediately preceding application for renewal, he or she attended the licensee completed continuing education courses or programs, approved by the board, totaling not less than 30 hours or satisfactorily completed a proficiency examination according to rules promulgated by the department in consultation with the board. (b) That a licensee seeking renewal of a pharmacy technician's license furnish the department with satisfactory evidence that, during the 2 years immediately preceding application for renewal, he or she has attended the licensee completed at least 20 hours of continuing education courses or programs, approved by the board, or satisfactorily completed a proficiency examination according to rules promulgated by the department in consultation with the board. (2) The department in consultation with the board shall promulgate rules requiring each applicant for license renewal to complete as part of the continuing education or proficiency examination requirement of subsection (1) an appropriate number of hours or courses in pain and symptom management. (3) The department shall allow for 100% of the continuing education required under this section to be earned through online or electronic media. An online or electronic media must meet standards approved by the department in consultation with the board.